District of Columbia statutes.
7-124

Fitness report.

The Department of Health shall provide data relating to physical activity, nutrition, and obesity and technical assistance to the Mayor’s Council to assist it in publishing the annual fitness report required by § 7-122(a)(3).

Dec. 2, 2011, D.C. Law 19-58, § 5, 58 DCR 8969

History